hr-HR: Oblik spužvice: Konturirana; Ravnog ruba; Zaobljena; Suza; Ostalo
cs: Tvar houbičky: Konturovaný; Ploché okraje; Zaoblený; Slza; Jiné
el: Σχήμα σφουγγαριού: Με περίγραμμα; Επίπεδες άκρες; Στρογγυλεμένη; Δάκρυ; Άλλο
lt-LT: Kempinės forma: Kontūruota; Plokščiu kraštu; Apvali; Lašo formos; Kita
tr: Sünger şekli: Konturlu; Düz kenarlı; Yuvarlak; Gözyaşı; Diğer
nl: Sponsvorm: Voorgevormd; Met platte randen; Afgerond; Traan; Andere
pl: Kształt gąbki: Wyprofilowane; Płaskie krawędzie; Zakrąglony; Łza; Pozostałe
ro-RO: Formă burete: Conturat; Cu muchii plate; Rotunjită; Lacrimă; Altele
fr: Forme d’éponge: Profilé; Bord plat; Arrondi; Mini-caravane; Autre
ja: スポンジの形: 輪郭; フラットエッジ; ラウンド; ティアドロップ; その他
hu: Szivacs alakja: Körvonalas; Lapos szélű; Lekerekített; Könnycsepp; Egyéb
pt-BR: Formato da esponja: Contornado; Borda plana; Arredondado; Mini-trailer; Outro
da: Svampeform: Kontureret; Fladkantet; Afrundet; Tåre; Andet
sl-SI: Oblika gobice: Oblikovana; Ravni robovi; Zaokrožena; Kaplja; Drugo
es: Forma de la esponja: Contorneado; Borde plano; Redondeado; Lágrima; Otros
sv: Svampform: Konturerad; Plattkantad; Avrundad; Teardrop; Annat
it: Forma della spugna: Sagomata; Bordi piatti; Arrotondata; Goccia; Altro
en: Sponge shape: Contoured; Flat-edged; Rounded; Teardrop; Other
de: Schwammform: Konturiert; Flachkantig; Gerundet; Träne; Sonstiges
ru: Форма губки: Контурный; С плоскими краями; Круглая; Каплевидная; Другое
zh-CN: 海绵形状: 轮廓; 平边; 圆形; 泪滴状; 其他
th: รูปร่างฟองน้ำ: โค้งมน; ขอบแบน; โค้งมน; หยดน้ำตา; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Форма на гъбичка: Контурен; Плоски ръбове; Заоблена; Teardrop; Други
zh-TW: 海綿形狀: 輪廓; 平邊; 圓形; 淚珠; 其他
fi: Sienen muoto: Muotoiltu; Tasareunainen; Pyöristetty; Kyynel; Muu
pt-PT: Formato da esponja: Contornado; Borda plana; Arredondado; Em forma de lágrima; Outro
ko: 스펀지 모양: 윤곽; 납작한 모서리; 둥근; 티어드롭; 기타
nb: Svampform: Konturformet; Flatkantet; Avrundet; Teardrop; Annen
sk-SK: Tvar hubky: Tvarovaný; Plochý okraj; Zaoblený; Slzný; Iné
vi: Kiểu dáng miếng dặm phấn: Hình dạng được định hình; Cạnh phẳng; Tròn trịa; Nhỏ gọn; Khác